Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3535
Hospital district; board of directors; meetings; officers; selection; expenses.

The board of directors shall meet on or before the second Monday after the completion of organization of the district and shall organize by the election of a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary-treasurer. The members of such board shall serve without compensation, except that each shall be allowed his or her actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses incurred in the performance of his or her official duties with reimbursement for mileage to be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 7, p. 377;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.26;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 17.